District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

6-1104.01

Maintenance of property; prevention of demolition by neglect.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-144, § 5a
as added Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 104(b), 48 DCR 1888
Nov 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-185, § 2(e), 53 DCR 6712
Delegation of Authority Under D.C. Law 13-281, the “Abatement and Condemnation of Nuisance Property Omnibus Amendment Act of 2002”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-33, March 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 1875).